Utah statutes.
53-3-214.7.   License or identification card checkoff for promoting and supporting organ donation.

(1)  A person who applies for a license or identification card or a renewal of a license or identification card may designate a voluntary contribution of $2 for the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation.

(2)  This contribution shall be:

(a)  collected by the division;

(b)  treated as a voluntary contribution to the Organ Donation Contribution Fund created in Section 26-18b-101 and not as a license fee; and

(c)  transferred to the Organ Donation Contribution Fund created in Section 26-18b-101 at least monthly, less actual administrative costs associated with collecting and transferring the contributions.

